New Jersey, session 222, S1104.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2025, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, there are appropriated from the General Fund the following amounts for the purposes specified: 46 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 20 Physical and Mental Health 22 Health Planning and Evaluation GRANTS-IN-AID 07-4270  Health Care Systems Analysis ............................ $1,000,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Health Planning and Evaluation ...................... $1,000,000 Grants-in-Aid: 07    Camden Coalition of Healthcare Providers Pledge to Connect Program................................................. ($1,000,000) 22 DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 55 Social Services Programs GRANTS-IN-AID 05-8050  Community Resources ............................................ $500,000 Total Grants-In-Aid appropriation, Social Services Programs ................................... $500,000 Grants-In-Aid: 05   Camden Coalition of Healthcare Providers Housing First Program ......................................($500,000) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.